District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

4-211.03

Home repairs — Federal financial participation.

Repealed.

Apr. 6, 1982, D.C. Law 4-101, § 1103, 29 DCR 1060
Mar. 20, 1998, D.C. Law 12-60, § 701(w), 44 DCR 7378
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-241, § 2(ooo), 46 DCR 905

History

1981 Ed., § 3-211.3.

Prior Codifications

For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2(x) of Public Assistance Temporary Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Law 12-130, July 24, 1998, law notification 45 DCR 6501).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2(ooo) of Self-Sufficiency Promotion Temporary Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Law 12-230, April 20, 1999, law notification 46 DCR 4143).

Temporary Amendment of Section

For temporary repeal of section, see § 2(ooo) of the Self-Sufficiency Promotion Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-372, June 9, 1998, 45 DCR 4270), § 2(ooo) of the Self-Sufficiency Promotion Legislative Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-425, July 31, 1998, 45 DCR 5682), § 2(ooo) of the Self-Sufficiency Promotion Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-552, December 24, 1998, 46 DCR 521), and § 2(ooo) of the Self-Sufficiency Promotion Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-19, February 17, 1999, 46 DCR 2492).

Emergency Legislation